th: โทนสีพื้นผิวผ้าใบ: สีดำ; สีขาวสว่าง; สีน้ำตาล (ลงโทน); โปร่งใส; สีเทา; สีขาวหม่น (ธรรมชาติ); สีขาว; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 畫布表面色調: 黑色; 亮白色; 棕色 (調色); 透明; 灰色; 米白色 (自然); 白色; 其他
zh-CN: 画布底色: 黑色; 亮白色; 棕色（调色）; 透明; 灰色; 米白色（自然色）; 白色; 其他
pl: Odcień powierzchni płótna: Czarny; Jaskrawobiały; Brązowy (tonowany); Przezroczysty; Szary; Złamana biel (naturalny); Biały; Inne
da: Lærredets overfladetone: Sort; Kridhvid; Brun; Gennemsigtig; Grå; Råhvid (naturlig); Hvid; Andet
lt-LT: Drobės paviršiaus tonas: Juoda; Ryškiai balta; Ruda (tonuota); Skaidri; Pilka; Gelsvai balta (natūrali); Balta; Kita
ko: 캔버스 표면 색조: 검정색; 밝은 흰색; 갈색(톤); 투명색; 회색; 오프화이트(내추럴); 흰색; 기타
nb: Tone på lerretsoverflaten: Svart; Knallhvit; Brun (tonet); Gjennomsiktig; Grå; Off-white (naturlig); Hvit; Annet
sv: Målardukens ytfärg: Svart; Klarvit; Brun (tonad); Genomskinlig; Grå; Naturvit (naturlig); Vit; Övrigt
nl: Canvas oppervlaktetint: Zwart; Helderwit; Bruin (getint); Transparant; Grijs; Gebroken wit (natuurlijk); Wit; Overig
el: Τόνος επιφάνειας καμβά: Μαύρο; Λαμπερό λευκό; Καφέ (με απόχρωση); Διάφανο; Γκρι; Υπόλευκο (φυσικό); Λευκό; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tonul suprafeței pânzei: Negru; Alb strălucitor; Maro (nuanțat); Transparent; Gri; Alb murdar (natural); Alb; Altele
hu: Vászon felületi tónusa: Fekete; Élénkfehér; Barna (tónusos); Átlátszó; Szürke; Törtfehér (természetes); Fehér; Egyéb
en: Canvas surface tone: Black; Bright white; Brown (toned); Clear; Gray; Off-white (natural); White; Other
fr: Teinte de la surface de la toile: Noir; Blanc éclatant; Marron (teinté); Transparent; Gris; Blanc cassé (naturel); Blanc; Autre
pt-PT: Tom da superfície do ecrã: Preto; Branco brilhante; Castanho (tonificado); Transparente; Cinzento; Branco-sujo (natural); Branco; Outro
de: Oberflächenton der Leinwand: Schwarz; Strahlendes Weiß; Braun (getönt); Transparent; Grau; Gebrochenes Weiß (natürlich); Weiß; Sonstige
pt-BR: Tom da superfície da tela: Preto; Branco brilhante; Marrom (tonalizado); Transparente; Cinza; Off-white (natural); Branco; Outro
fi: Kankaan pinnan sävy: Musta; Kirkkaanvalkoinen; Ruskea (sävytetty); Läpinäkyvä; Harmaa; Luonnonvalkoinen; Valkoinen; Muu
tr: Tuval yüzey tonu: Siyah; Parlak beyaz; Kahverengi (tonlu); Transparan; Gri; Kırık beyaz (doğal); Beyaz; Diğer
it: Tonalità della superficie della tela: Nero; Bianco brillante; Marrone (tonalità); Trasparente; Grigio; Bianco sporco (naturale); Bianco; Altro
bg-BG: Тон на повърхността на платното: Черно; Яркобяло; Кафяво (тонирано); Прозрачно; Сиво; Мръснобяло (естествено); Бяло; Други
hr-HR: Ton površine platna: Crna; Žarkobijela; Smeđa (nijansirano); Prozirna; Siva; Prljavobijela (prirodna); Bijela; Ostalo
sk-SK: Odtieň povrchu plátna: Čierny; Jasný biely; Hnedý (tónovaný); Priehľadný; Sivý; Sivobiely (prírodný); Biely; Iné
ja: キャンバスの表面の色調: 黒; ブライトホワイト; 茶色 (トーンド); 透明; 灰色; オフホワイト (ナチュラル); 白; その他
cs: Tón povrchu plátna: Černá; Zářivě bílá; Hnědá (tónovaná); Průhledná; Šedá; Krémově bílá (přírodní); Bílá; Ostatní
es: Tono de la superficie del lienzo: Negro; Blanco brillante; Marrón (tonificado); Transparente; Gris; Blanco hueso (natural); Blanco; Otro
sl-SI: Ton površine platna: Črna; Svetlo bela; Rjava (tonirana); Prozorna; Siva; Umazano bela (naravna); Bela; Drugo
vi: Màu sắc bề mặt vải canvas: Màu đen; Trắng sáng; Màu nâu (tông màu); Trong suốt; Màu xám; Trắng nhạt (tự nhiên); Màu trắng; Khác
ru: Тон поверхности холста: Черный; Ярко-белый; Коричневый (тонированный); Прозрачный; Серый; Белый с желтоватым оттенком (натуральный); Белый; Другое